docs/dictionaries/hunspell/russian/adjectives.aff
SET UTF-8

WORDCHARS 0123456789’-.

BREAK 0

NOSPLITSUGS
MAXNGRAMSUGS 2
ONLYMAXDIFF
MAXDIFF 0

# данный
SFX D N 12
SFX D ый ого .
SFX D ый ому .
SFX D ый ым .
SFX D ый ом .
SFX D ый ая .
SFX D ый ой .
SFX D ый ую .
SFX D ый ое .
SFX D ый ые .
SFX D ый ых .
SFX D ый ым .
SFX D ый ыми .

# моральный
SFX M N 3
SFX M льный лен .
SFX M льный льна .
SFX M льный льны .

# противный
SFX P N 3
SFX P вный вен .
SFX P вный вна .
SFX P вный вны .

# сурово
SFX n N 1
SFX n о ее .
