docs/dictionaries/hunspell/russian/adjectives.dic
10
межтомный/D
мультиязычный/D
сгенерированный/D
небинарный/D
мультиязычный/D
инлайновый/D
эксплицитно/n
комфортно/n
опциональный/M
неинтуитивный/DP
